Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.040

Reckless burning in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of reckless burning in the first degree if he or she recklessly damages a building or other structure or any vehicle, railway car, aircraft, or watercraft or any hay, grain, crop, or timber whether cut or standing, by knowingly causing a fire or explosion.

(2) Reckless burning in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 367; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.040.]